Washington statutes.
RCW 16.24.050

Change of boundaries.

When the county legislative authority of any county deem[s] it advisable to change the boundary or boundaries of any stock restricted area, a hearing shall be held in the same manner as provided in RCW 16.24.020. If the county legislative authority decides to change the boundary or boundaries of any stock restricted area or areas, it shall within thirty days after the conclusion of such hearing make an order describing said change or changes. Such order shall be entered upon the records of the county and published in a newspaper having general circulation in such county once each week for four successive weeks.

[ 1989 c 286 s 7; 1937 c 40 s 4; 1923 c 93 s 1; RRS s 3070-1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 286: See note following RCW 16.04.010.